Hawaii statutes.
[§671D-14] Construction. (a) Except
as specifically provided in this part, nothing in this part shall be construed
as changing the liabilities or immunities under law.

(b) Nothing in this part shall be construed as
requiring health care entities to provide clinical privileges to any or all
classes or types of physicians or other licensed health care practitioners.

(c) Nothing in this part shall be construed as
affecting or modifying any provision of state law with respect to activities of
professional review bodies regarding nurses, other licensed health care
practitioners, or other health professionals who are not physicians.

(d) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed
as affecting in any manner the rights and remedies afforded patients under any
provision of state law to seek redress for any harm or injury suffered as a
result of negligent treatment or care by any physician, health care
practitioner, or health care entity, or as limiting any defenses or immunities
available to any physician, health care practitioner, or health care entity. [L
1989, c 354, pt of §3 and c 363, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next